New Jersey, session 221, S2024.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there are appropriated from the General Fund the following amounts for the purposes specified: 26 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 16 Detention and Rehabilitation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 08-7040  Institutional Care and Treatment ........................ $2,500,000 99-7040  Administration and Support Services ................... 7,300,000 Total Direct State Services appropriation, Detention and Rehabilitation ........................... $9,800,000 Direct State Services: Materials and Supplies ......................... ($9,800,000) 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 53 Economic Assistance and Security 7550 Division of Family Development STATE AID 15-7550  Income Maintenance Management ................... $12,111,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Division of Family Development .................. $12,111,000 State Aid: 15    Payments for Cost of General Assistance ........................................... ($7,918,000) 15    Payments for Supplemental Security Income ($4,193,000) 2.  The following item in section 1 of P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is amended as follows: 82 DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 51 Economic Planning and Development GRANTS-IN-AID 38-2043  Economic Development ...... [$323,682,000] $299,682,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Economic Planning and Development .............................. ....................................... [$323,682,000] $299,682,000 Grants-in-Aid: [38          Jersey City Redevelopment Agency  Art Museum Project .................................  ($24,000,000)] 3.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, there are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund the following amounts for the purposes specified: 34 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31 Direct Educational Services and Assistance STATE AID 01-5120  General Formula Aid ........................................... $6,764,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund ..       $6,764,000) 36-5120  Student Transportation ........................................ $4,455,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund ..       $4,455,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $11,219,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund ..       $11,219,000) State Aid: 01    Equalization Aid (PTRF) ..................... ($6,764,000) 36    Transportation Aid (PTRF) .................. ($4,455,000) 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 23 Behavioral Health Services 7700 Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services STATE AID 08-7700  Community Services............................................. $4,300,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund ..       $4,300,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services $4,300,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund ..       $4,300,000) State Aid: 08    Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals (PTRF)     ($4,300,000) 4.  The following language provisions are added to section 1 of P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, as follows: 46 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 20 Physical and Mental Health 22 Health Planning and Evaluation GRANTS-IN-AID Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated to Robert Wood Johnson Barnabas Health  Community Health Projects, amounts may be transferred to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services and are appropriated, consistent with CMS guidelines, solely to maximize federal Medicaid payments to faculty physicians and non-physician professionals who are affiliated with Robert Wood Johnson Barnabas Health, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 24 Special Health Services 7540 Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services GRANTS-IN-AID Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $50,000,000 of the amounts received by the State pursuant to P.L.2020, c.145 (C.17:48E-46.1 et al.) and on deposit in the Health Care Affordability and Accessibility Fund, are appropriated to the Department of Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services to fund Medical Coverage  Title XIX Parents and Children in the General Medical Services program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 82 DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 51 Economic Planning and Development GRANTS-IN-AID Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2023, c.97 (C.34:1B-4.2 et al.), or the provisions of any other law or regulation to the contrary, $10,000,000 of the amount appropriated pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2023, c.97 for Film-Lease Partner Facility Investments, EDA (P.L.2023, c.97) shall be used by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority for programs, projects, and initiatives that support the film and digital media industry, as determined by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for Real Estate Projects Funding, EDA, such amounts as may be required may be transferred to the Economic Recovery Fund  Strategic Innovation Centers and Maternal and Infant Health Innovation Center, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 5.  The following language provision in section 1 of P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is amended to read as follows: Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, amounts hereinabove appropriated for Preschool Education Aid shall be allocated as follows: 1) in the case of a district that received Early Launch to Learning Initiative aid in the 2007-2008 school year, an amount equal to the district's 2007-2008 allocation of Early Launch to Learning Initiative aid; 2) in the case of a school district that received a 2008-2009 allocation of Preschool Education Aid based on its 2007-2008 Early Childhood Program Aid allocation, an aid amount equal to the district's 2022-2023 per pupil allocation of Preschool Education Aid inflated by the CPI and multiplied by the district's projected preschool enrollment, except in the case of a school district that participated in the federal Preschool Expansion Grant in 2018-2019, districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Expansion Aid in 2017-2018 or 2018-2019, and districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Aid through the competitive process administered by the Commissioner of Education which began in 2019-2020; 3) in the case of any other district with an allocation of Preschool Education Aid in the 2022-2023 school year calculated using the provisions of section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54), districts that participated in the federal Preschool Expansion Grant in 2018-2019, districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Expansion Aid in 2017-2018 or 2018-2019, or districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Aid through the competitive process administered by the Commissioner of Education which began in 2019-2020, an amount calculated in accordance with those provisions based upon 2023-2024 projected FTE enrollments, and multiplied by the per pupil allocations as set forth in the March 2023 State Aid notice issued by the commissioner. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Preschool Education Aid, an amount not to exceed $40,000,000 shall be allocated [by the commissioner] in amounts to be determined by the Commissioner of Education: 1) to districts in total additional preschool funding for the purpose of expanding free access to full-day preschool for resident three- and four-year old children in accordance with the preschool quality standards issued by the commissioner and based on a district's demonstration of its readiness to operate a preschool program consistent with those standards; and 2) to the Department of Education to address workforce preparation and training and other ancillary needs related to preschool expansion[, as determined by the commissioner]. A school district that receives Preschool Education Aid for the first time in the 2023-2024 school year shall demonstrate, in its application, due diligence in establishing partnerships to provide its preschool program through a mixed-delivery system in all licensed child care providers and Head Start programs in its community or neighboring communities that are willing and able to meet all preschool program requirements. The Department of Education, the Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Human Services shall post on the departments' Internet websites, no later than July 14, 2023, a list of all districts eligible to apply for Preschool Education Aid and a list of all child care providers and Head Start programs in each eligible district's community, as well as neighboring communities, and contact information for those providers. The Department of Education, the Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Human Services shall, in consultation with school districts, licensed child care providers, Head Start programs, and other stakeholders identified by the Commissioner of Education, provide a report to the Legislature, on or before March 1, 2024, on the status of preschool education in the State, generally, and on the efficacy of the mixed-delivery model of preschool education. The Department of Education may utilize up to $250,000 of Preschool Education Aid to contract temporary staff to assist with preparation of a report on the efficacy of the mixed-delivery model of preschool education as provided herein. 6.  This act shall take effect immediately.